Utah statutes.
41-6a-802.   Turning around -- Where prohibited -- Visibility.

(1)  As used in this section, "railroad grade crossing" means the area between the passive or active warning signs where a railroad track and roadway intersect.

(2)  The operator of a vehicle may not make a U-turn or turn the vehicle to proceed in the opposite direction:

(a)  unless the movement can be made safely and without interfering with other traffic; 

(b)  on any curve, or upon the approach to, or near the crest of a grade, if the vehicle is not visible at a distance of 500 feet by the operator of any other vehicle approaching from either direction; and

(c)  on a railroad track or railroad grade crossing.

